Utah statutes.
31A-20-101.   Underwriting limitations.

No insurer may insure or attempt to insure against:

(1)  a wager or gaming risk;

(2)  loss of an election;

(3)  the penal consequences of a crime; or

(4)  punitive damages.



Amended by Chapter 204, 1986 General Session

